Utah statutes.
72-7-305.   Driving animals over highways -- Liability for damages.
(1)  Except for a livestock highway, a person who drives a herd of domestic
animals over a public highway is liable for any damage done by the animals in
destroying the banks or rolling rocks into or upon the highway.
(2)  The damage may be recovered in a civil action brought by a highway
authority having jurisdiction over the highway.
